Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1959.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.2451, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 10. new text end new text begin Eligibility for grant funds. new text end new text begin (a) Teacher preparation programs approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board are eligible to receive grant funding under all current and future state programs designed to support teacher preparation, licensure, or recruitment, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) Grow Your Own programs under section 122A.73; new text end new text begin (2) the collaborative urban and greater Minnesota educators of color grant program under section 122A.635; new text end new text begin (3) the student teaching stipend pilot program under Laws 2024, chapter 115, article 5, section 20; new text end new text begin (4) grants for underrepresented student teachers under section 136A.1274; new text end new text begin (5) grants for student teachers in shortage areas under section 136A.1275; new text end new text begin (6) the aspiring teachers of color scholarship program under Laws 2021, First Special Session chapter 2, article 2, section 45; new text end new text begin (7) teacher mentorship and induction programs under section 122A.70; and new text end new text begin (8) the teacher shortage loan repayment program under section 136A.1791. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of education must include all teacher preparation programs approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board in all requests for proposals, notices of grant opportunities, and eligibility determinations under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to grant awards issued on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.73, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Grow Your Own district programs. (a) A school district, charter school, Tribal contract school, or cooperative unit under section 123A.24, subdivision 2, new text begin and all teacher preparation programs approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board new text end may apply for a grant for a teacher preparation program that meets the requirements of paragraph (c) to establish a Grow Your Own pathway for adults to obtain their first professional teaching license. The grant recipient must use at least 80 percent of grant funds to provide tuition scholarships or stipends to enable grant recipient employees or community members affiliated with a grant recipient, who are of color or American Indian and who seek a teaching license, to participate in the teacher preparation program. Grant funds may also be used to pay for teacher licensure exams and licensure fees. (b) A district using grant funds under this subdivision to provide financial support to teacher candidates may require a commitment as determined by the district to teach in the school district, charter school, Tribal contract school, or cooperative unit for a reasonable amount of time that does not exceed five years. (c) A grantee must partner with: (1) a Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board-approved teacher preparation program; (2) a Council for the Accreditation of Educator Preparation-accredited teacher preparation program from a private, not for profit, institution of higher education; or (3) an institution that has an articulated transfer pathway with a board-approved teacher preparation program. new text begin (d) Teacher preparation programs approved by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board are deemed eligible for all grant funds available under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025, and applies to grant opportunities issued on or after that date. new text end